Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 4. Protection of Purchasers.

§ 55.1-2020.
Deposits to be held in escrow.

Any deposit made with a reservation to purchase or a contract to purchase shall be held in escrow in a separate fund for such deposits designated as such until the deed for which a deposit was made is delivered to the depositor.

History.

1973, c. 375, § 55-79.21:1; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.